Maine, session 132, LD1661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-D, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7.
Maine Invasive Species Advisory Council Legislative Per Diem 12 MRSA §12405

Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §12405 is enacted to read:
§12405. Maine Invasive Species Advisory Council
The Maine Invasive Species Advisory Council, referred to in this section as "the
council," is established to advise the Governor and Legislature on how to evaluate and
prioritize invasive species management objectives across all taxa.
1. Council membership. The council consists of the following 20 members:
A. The following 8 members from the Legislature and executive agencies:
(1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) The Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry or the
commissioner's designee;
(4) The Commissioner of Environmental Protection or the commissioner's
designee;
(5) The Commissioner of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife or the commissioner's
designee;
(6) The Commissioner of Marine Resources or the commissioner's designee;
(7) The Commissioner of Transportation or the commissioner's designee; and
(8) The Commissioner of Health and Human Services or the commissioner's
designee; and
B. The following 12 members appointed by the Governor representing state interests
affected by invasive species across all taxa:
(1) One member representing fisheries;
(2) One member representing agriculture;
(3) One member representing municipal governments;
(4) One member representing forest industries;
(5) One member representing the federally recognized Indian tribes, nations and
bands in the State;
(6) One member representing soil and water conservation districts;
(7) One member representing the outdoor recreation industry;
(8) One member representing the nursery and landscaping industry;
Page 1 - 132LR1076(01)

(9) One member representing lake and river interests;
(10) One member representing the University of Maine's climate change institute
or successor organization; and
(11) Two members representing environmental nonprofit organizations or private
foundations focused on invasive species issues.
A legislative member appointed pursuant to paragraph A, subparagraph (1) or (2) serves
for the duration of the Legislature in which the legislative member was appointed. At the
end of a legislative member's term, the member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed. Legislative members are entitled to receive the legislative per diem, as defined
in Title 3, section 2, and reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses for their
attendance at meetings of the council. Members appointed by the Governor pursuant to
paragraph B serve 4-year terms, except that, as determined by the Governor, of the initial
appointments, 6 appointments must be for 3 years and 6 appointments must be for 2 years.
A member appointed by the Governor serves until the member's successor is appointed. A
vacancy must be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term. If after 6 months the
Governor cannot fill a vacancy on the council in a position listed in paragraph B, the
Governor may appoint a member who does not meet the qualifications of paragraph B but
who has demonstrated experience or interest in the area of threats posed by invasive
species.
2. Council chairs. The Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry and
the Commissioner of Environmental Protection or their designees serve as cochairs of the
council.
3. Meetings. The council shall meet at least quarterly and must be staffed by the
Comprehensive Invasive Species Management Office under section 12406.
4. Consultation. The council may consult with any organization, educational
institution or governmental agency, including, but not limited to, the United States
Department of Agriculture; the United States Department of Homeland Security; the
United States Department of the Interior, National Invasive Species Council; and the Maine
Climate Council under Title 38, section 577-A.
5. Duties. The council shall:
A. From time to time assess the nature, scope and magnitude of the environmental,
ecological, agricultural, economic, recreational and social impacts caused by invasive
species in the State;
B. From time to time identify actions taken by members of the council, state and local
governments and the public to prevent the introduction of invasive species; detect and
respond rapidly to and control populations of invasive species in a cost-effective and
environmentally sound manner; monitor invasive species populations accurately and
reliably; provide for restoration of native species and habitat conditions in ecosystems
that have been affected by invasive species; conduct research on invasive species and
develop technologies to prevent introduction of invasive species; provide for
environmentally sound control of invasive species; promote public education on
invasive species; and aid in the development of means to address invasive species;
C. Develop a comprehensive plan for invasive species management. The plan must
address all taxa of invasive species. The plan must, at a minimum, recommend
Page 2 - 132LR1076(01)

415 interagency responsibilities; describe coordination among different agencies and
426 organizations; recommend approaches to funding work related to invasive species;
437 address prevention, early detection and rapid response; identify opportunities for
448 control of invasive species and restoration of native species and habitat conditions in
459 ecosystems that have been affected by invasive species, including research needs; and
560 describe effective outreach and education. The plan must recommend responsibilities
571 for the different agencies and organizations, with the goal of reducing or eliminating,
582 when practicable, contradictory or conflicting policies or programs. The plan must
593 identify needs for additional staff positions within state agencies and recommend state
1504 or federal laws, rules or regulations. The plan must place an emphasis on prevention,
1515 early detection and rapid response. The plan must evaluate and incorporate, as
1526 appropriate, the approved action plan for managing invasive aquatic plants and
1537 nuisance species pursuant to Title 38, section 1872;
D. Provide input on funding priorities and grant applications regarding money made
available for the implementation of this section and grants for projects related to the
control and management of invasive species, education and outreach efforts and for
projects aimed at the early detection and prevention of invasive species;
E. Organize and convene a biennial invasive species summit to focus and maintain
attention on the State's comprehensive invasive species plan under paragraph C;
F. Encourage industries and trade organizations to develop and adopt voluntary codes
of conduct designed to reduce or eliminate the use and distribution of invasive species,
review these voluntary codes of conduct and officially recognize adopted codes of
conduct;
G. Support within available funds and encourage partnerships for regional invasive
species management efforts to address invasive species through the coordination,
recruitment and training of volunteers, education, early detection, rapid response,
eradication, research and planning;
H. Submit to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
agriculture, conservation and forestry matters and environmental protection matters
and the Governor prior to January 1, 2027 a comprehensive plan for invasive species
management under paragraph C and updates to the plan every 2 years thereafter; and
I. Develop recommendations on statutory actions to prohibit, manage and control
invasive species.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §12406 is enacted to read:
§12406. Comprehensive Invasive Species Management Office
The Comprehensive Invasive Species Management Office, referred to in this section
as "the office," is established within the Office of the Governor to coordinate interagency
collaboration to accomplish invasive species prevention, management, education and
outreach as prioritized and directed by the Maine Invasive Species Advisory Council under
section 12405.
The office must be staffed by a statewide coordinator who is directed by the Maine
Invasive Species Advisory Council and who is attached to the Office of the Governor for
administrative purposes.
Page 3 - 132LR1076(01)